North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-35 Pesticide Act [Repealed]

4-35-01.
Title. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-02.
Creation of pesticide control board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-03.
Enforcing agency. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-04.
Declaration of purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-05.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 5; 1983, ch. 82, § 7; 1985, ch. 103, § 4; 1989, ch. 88, § 1; 1989, ch. 89, § 1; 1991, ch. 71, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 74, § 1; 2003, ch. 62, § 1; 2007, ch. 66, § 1; 2009, ch. 77, §
1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-06.
Pesticide control board to administer chapter and adopt regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 6; 1989, ch. 89, § 2; 2001, ch. 74, § 2; 2003, ch. 188, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-06.1.
Limitation on authority of political subdivisions regarding pesticides. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 60, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-06.2.
Crop protection product harmonization and registration board — Recovery of funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 72, § 1; 2001, ch. 75, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-06.3.
Minor use pesticide fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 72, § 2; 1999, ch. 31, § 3; 2001, ch. 75, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-07.
Experimental use permits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 188, § 3.

4-35-08.
Classification of commercial certificates. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 8; 1989, ch. 89, § 3; 2001, ch. 74, § 3; 2009, ch. 77, §
2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-09.
Commercial and public applicator’s certification. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 9; 1985, ch. 103, § 5; 1987, ch. 92, § 1; 1989, ch. 88, § 2; 1989, ch. 89, § 4; 2001, ch. 74, § 4; 2003, ch. 62, § 2; 2009, ch. 77, §
3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-09.1.
Proof of financial responsibility — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 73, § 1; 1999, ch. 62, § 1; 2001, ch. 76, § 1; 2009, ch. 77, §
4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-10.
Expiration of certification — Renewal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 10; 1989, ch. 89, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-11.
Nonresident application — Designation of agent for service of process. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 11; 1989, ch. 89, § 6; 2005, ch. 72, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-12.
Pesticide dealer certification — Employees — Requirements for purchase. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 12; 1979, ch. 109, § 1; 1985, ch. 103, § 6; 1989, ch. 89, § 7; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 59, § 1; 2009, ch. 77, §
5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-12.1.
Stop-sale orders. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 103, § 3; 1991, ch. 71, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-13.
Application of act to governmental entities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 13; 1989, ch. 88, § 3; 1989, ch. 89, § 8; 2001, ch. 74, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-14.
Private applicators — Certification. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 14; 1987, ch. 92, § 2; 1989, ch. 89, § 9; 2009, ch. 77, §
6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-15.
Unlawful acts — Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of a certification. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 15; 1987, ch. 92, § 3; 1989, ch. 89, § 18; 1991, ch. 71, § 3; 2001, ch. 74, § 6; 2009, ch. 77, §
7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-16.
Records — Retention — Submission to commissioner. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 16; 1989, ch. 89, § 11; 1991, ch. 71, § 4; 2003, ch. 62, § 3; 2009, ch. 77, §
8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-17.
License plates for equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 77, § 15.

4-35-18.
Reciprocal agreement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 18; 1981, ch. 100, § 1; 1987, ch. 92, § 4; 1989, ch. 89, § 13; 2003, ch. 62, § 5; 2009, ch. 77, §
9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-19.
Certification requirements — Exemptions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 19; 1989, ch. 88, § 4; 1989, ch. 89, § 14; 2001, ch. 74, § 7; 2009, ch. 77, §
10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-20.
Discarding and storing of pesticides, pesticide containers, and rinsate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 20; 1991, ch. 71, § 5; 2009, ch. 77, §
11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-21.
Reports of pesticide accidents or loss. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 67, § 2.

4-35-21.1.
Reports of loss through pesticide application required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 67, § 2.

4-35-21.2.
Contents of verified reports of damage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 67, § 2.

4-35-21.3.
Pesticide application — Alleged property damage — Notification of applicator. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-22.
Subpoenas. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 22; 1989, ch. 89, § 15; 2009, ch. 77, §
12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-23.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 23; 1985, ch. 103, § 8; 2003, ch. 62, § 6; 2009, ch. 77, §
13; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-24.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 24; 1985, ch. 103, § 9; 1989, ch. 89, § 16; 1991, ch. 71, § 6; 2009, ch. 77, §
14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-25.
Information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 25; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-26.
Delegation of duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 26; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-27.
Cooperation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 27; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-28.
Disposition of funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 63, § 28; 1989, ch. 89, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35-29.
Prior liability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 77, § 15.

4-35-30.
Crop protection product harmonization and registration board — Duties — Grants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 75, § 3; 2001, ch. 9, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, §
97; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.